Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
General Obligation Bonds for Road Construction

177.580.
State debt contracted — Legislative intent for KRS 177.580 to 177.630 — Approval of people.

Subject to the provisions of Sections 49 and 50 of the Constitution of Kentucky, there is hereby contracted on behalf of the Commonwealth a debt in the amount of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). It is hereby declared to be the intent of the General Assembly in enacting KRS

177.580

to

177.630

and contracting the aforesaid debt on behalf of the Commonwealth to provide a method whereby the Commonwealth of Kentucky can issue bonds directly obligating the Commonwealth in an amount of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for the purpose of providing funds to match federal funds allocated to Kentucky for the construction and reconstruction of highways, tunnels and bridges within the Commonwealth of Kentucky, subject to the approval of the people of the Commonwealth of Kentucky as provided in section 50 of the Constitution of Kentucky; such approval or disapproval to be expressed at the general election to be held on November 6, 1956.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1, effective June 26, 1956.

177.585.
Bonds to be issued — Denominations — Interest — Coupons — Payment — Registration with Finance and Administration Cabinet — Exemption from state, county and municipal taxation — Cost of printing.

Bonds of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be issued in the total amount of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). Said bonds shall be of the denomination of one hundred dollars ($100), or such multiples thereof as the state property and buildings commission may determine; shall be engraved, lithographed or printed, as said commission shall determine; shall be signed at the time of their respective issuance by the Governor then in office, and at the same time attested by the Secretary of State then in office, with the seal of the Commonwealth affixed. All of said bonds shall bear interest at such rate, not exceeding three percent (3%) per annum, as said commission shall determine at the time of such issue. All of said bonds shall bear date of January 1, 1957. The interest thereon shall be payable semiannually January first and July first of each year thereafter. There shall be attached to said bonds coupons for such semiannual interest bearing the facsimile signature of the Governor and the Treasurer of the Commonwealth, the last coupon on each bond being due at the date of maturity of the bond to which it is attached. Said bonds and coupons shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at such place or places as the State Property and Buildings Commission may determine. Said bonds, at the request of the owners, may be registered as to principal and interest with the Finance and Administration Cabinet of the Commonwealth of Kentucky upon the payment of a registration fee of fifty cents ($0.50) on each one thousand dollars ($1,000) principal amount of said bonds. All of said bonds and the interest thereon shall be exempt from state, county and municipal taxation. Save as in KRS

177.580

to

177.630

provided, the form of said bonds, and the method of registration shall be determined by the State Property and Buildings Commission. The cost of engraving, lithographing or printing said bonds shall be certified by the State Property and Buildings Commission to the Finance and Administration Cabinet for payment and shall be paid out of the state road fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 2, effective June 26, 1956.

177.590.
Serial numbers — Maturity dates.

Said bonds shall bear serial numbers beginning with number one (1) and shall mature on such dates, with such provisions as to prior redemption including premiums therefor, as may be determined by the State Property and Buildings Commission, providing that all of such bonds shall mature within thirty (30) years from January 1, 1957.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 3, effective June 26, 1956.

177.595.
Full faith and credit of state pledged — Funds derived from certain taxes to be set aside in amount sufficient to pay principal and interest — Exception.

The bonds herein provided for shall be direct obligations of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth hereby is pledged for the payment of said bonds and the interest thereon. In order to provide for the payment of the principal of all of said bonds at their maturity and the interest thereon annually as same shall accrue, there shall be levied and collected in each of the thirty (30) years from January 1, 1957, to January 1, 1987, taxes for the benefit of the state road fund in the form of license, excise taxes and fees relating to registration, operation and use of vehicles on public highways and excise taxes, use and license taxes relating to gasoline and other motor fuels used upon the public highways in Kentucky at rates not less than the rates now imposed by law or so adjusted as to produce for the road fund not less than the amount now derived from all of such taxes. All funds derived from such taxes hereby are appropriated to the extent necessary for the payment of the principal and interest on said bonds. From the funds derived from said taxes in each year, beginning January 1, 1957, there shall be set aside and held inviolable for that purpose, a fund sufficient to pay the principal and interest on said bonds in each year as and when due until all of said bonds and the interest thereon shall have been paid in full. In each year, after setting aside the funds hereinabove provided, the remainder of the funds derived from such taxes may be expended and used for the cost of administration, statutory refunds and adjustment, payment of highway obligations, costs of construction, reconstruction, rights-of-way, maintenance and repair of public highways, tunnels and bridges and the expense of enforcing state traffic and motor vehicle laws, provided that all the funds collected under KRS Chapter 138 and required by KRS

138.220

and 138.660(2) to be set aside by the Department of Highways for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of rural and secondary roads shall be first set aside and used for such purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 4, effective June 26, 1956; 1986, ch. 331, § 30, effective July 15, 1986.

177.600.
Time of sale — Units.

All of said bonds need not be sold at one (1) time, but may be advertised and sold in units of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) principal amount as and when the money to be derived from the issuance and sale of said bonds may be needed. The State Property and Buildings Commission shall determine the time when and the principal amount of said bonds that shall be advertised and sold.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 5, effective June 26, 1956.

177.605.
Advertisements for bids before sale of bonds — Bids to be in writing and sealed — Opening of bids — Rejection — Premium and accrued interest to be deposited in sinking fund — Destruction of matured coupons — Cost of advertising.

Before any of said bonds shall be sold, said State Property and Buildings Commission shall advertise not less than once in each of the four (4) weeks preceding the day of sale in at least three (3) newspapers of general circulation in Kentucky and in some one (1) or more recognized financial journals published in the city of New York for bids therefor, and all bids shall be in writing and sealed, and on the day fixed therefor shall be publicly opened by the State Property and Buildings Commission at a time and place designated in the advertisement for bids. None of said bonds shall be sold at less than par and accrued interest, and each advertisement for bids shall so state. Said bonds shall be sold to the highest and best bidder. Said State Property and Buildings Commission shall have the right to reject any and all bids. Any premium and accrued interest received shall be deposited in the sinking fund provided by KRS

177.580

to

177.630

for the payment of said bonds and interest thereon. On the sale of said bonds, all matured coupons shall be detached and destroyed by the State Property and Buildings Commission and a record made of such destruction. The cost incurred by the State Property and Buildings Commission in advertising for bids and in making the sale of said bonds shall be certified by said commission to the Finance and Administration Cabinet and shall be paid out of the state road fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 6, effective June 26, 1956.

177.610.
Terms for bonds.

The State Property and Buildings Commission shall specify such terms for the bonds that are not inconsistent with the provisions of KRS

177.580

to

177.630

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 7, effective June 26, 1956.

177.615.
Investment or deposit of amounts received for sinking fund.

The State Property and Buildings Commission may invest any amounts received for the sinking fund provided in KRS

177.580

to

177.630

in interest-bearing obligations of the United States or the purchase of the bonds authorized by KRS

177.580

to

177.630

, or they may deposit said amounts in any state or national bank or trust company of Kentucky, but each such deposit shall be adequately secured by a corporate surety bond in some good and solvent corporate surety company authorized to do business in Kentucky, or by the deposit of United States government bonds which are direct obligations of the United States of America in an amount equal to each such deposit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 8, effective June 26, 1956.

177.620.
Investment or deposit of proceeds derived from sale of bonds — Use of proceeds.

The proceeds derived from the sale of the aforesaid bonds shall be held or invested by the State Property and Buildings Commission in the same manner and under the same restrictions set forth in KRS

177.615

as to the sinking fund and shall be used solely and only by the Department of Highways of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to match federal funds allocated to Kentucky for the construction and reconstruction of highways, tunnels and bridges within the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 9, effective June 26, 1956.

177.625.
Election — Notice to be published — Form of question — Duties of secretary of state — Certification of votes — Effect of election. [Repealed.]

177.630.
“Year” defined.

The word “year” as used in KRS

177.580

to

177.630

means calendar year, unless otherwise expressly stated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 11, effective June 26, 1956.

177.700.
Efforts to sell authorized and unissued bonds under existing restrictions to be continued — If effort unsuccessful, proposal to remove interest rate limit to be submitted to voters at an election.

The State Property and Buildings Commission (hereinafter sometimes referred to as the “commission”) is enjoined to continue its best efforts to sell and issue the heretofore unissued thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of the Commonwealth’s general obligation bonds, as provided in KRS

177.580

to

177.630

, which was approved by the voters at the election held on November 6, 1956 (such bonds, for convenience, being sometimes hereinafter referred to as the “unissued 1956 bonds”; and the aforesaid issue of which the same constitute a part being sometimes hereinafter referred to as the “1956 bonds”). In doing so, the commission shall in all respects observe the restrictive conditions presently applicable to said unissued 1956 bonds, in that any sale or sales shall be for not less than par or face amount with accrued interest to delivery, and at a rate or rates of interest not exceeding, as to any bond, three percent (3%) per annum, payable semiannually, and all of such bonds shall be caused to mature as to principal within thirty (30) years from January 1, 1957.

Unless said unissued 1956 bonds are successfully sold by the commission on or prior to August 31, 1960, a proposal as set forth in KRS

177.700

to

177.820

shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the Commonwealth at the regular election scheduled by law to be held on November 8, 1960, seeking the voters’ authorization and approval of removing, as to said unissued 1956 bonds, the three percent (3%) interest rate limitation presently applicable thereto. Inasmuch as said unissued 1956 bonds have been taken into account in determining the amount of money otherwise necessary to be provided through issuance of additional bonds as hereinafter set forth, such proposal that the voters remove said existing interest rate limitation as to the unissued 1956 bonds shall appear on the ballots at the election to be held on November 8, 1960, as a part of the ballot question submitting for authorization and approval KRS

177.700

to

177.820

as a whole and the proposed issuance of an additional one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth for state parks, and for highways, bridges and tunnels, as hereinafter provided. In such event the form of the question which shall be caused to appear upon the ballots at the election on November 8, 1960, shall be as set forth in KRS

177.740

.

In the event the said unissued 1956 bonds are successfully sold by the commission on or prior to August 31, 1960, according to the presently existing interest rate limitation, the commission shall, not later than September 1, 1960, so notify the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth; and inasmuch as there will then no longer be any occasion to seek authorization of the voters for removal of said interest rate limitation, the question to appear upon the ballots submitting KRS

177.700

to

177.820

for authorization and approval of the voters at the election on November 8, 1960, shall be as provided in KRS

177.750

.

Based upon representations made by the commission as set forth in this section the Secretary of State shall, after September 1, 1960, determine whether the form of question to be used in submitting KRS

177.700

to

177.820

to the voters for authorization and approval at the election on November 8, 1960, shall be as set forth in KRS

177.740

, or as set forth in KRS

177.750

, and shall certify the applicable form of ballot question to the respective county clerks at the same time that candidates for public office are provided to be certified pursuant to KRS

118.225

; and when each county clerk causes the ballots to be printed according to KRS

117.145

the form of question so certified by the Secretary of State shall be caused to appear thereon with appropriate spaces for the voters to designate “Yes” or “No”.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 1, effective June 16, 1960; 1978, ch. 384, § 301, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 134, effective July 15, 1980.

177.710.
Commonwealth to contract additional indebtedness not to exceed one hundred million dollars for parks, and for highways, bridges and tunnels — Submission to voters at an election on November 8, 1960, according to Section 50 of the Constitution.

Subject to the provisions of Section 50 of the Constitution of the Commonwealth, as hereinafter provided, a direct indebtedness of the Commonwealth in the principal amount of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in addition to the 1956 bonds, and in addition to any and all other bonds and indebtedness of the Commonwealth, shall be incurred by the Commonwealth through issuance of its general obligation bonds, for the prompt payment of which when due, both principal and interest, the full faith, credit, resources, and unlimited taxing power of the Commonwealth shall irrevocably be pledged; and from the proceeds thereof not to exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be and are hereby appropriated and shall be used for establishment, development, and improvement of state parks and for development and improvement of existing state parks; and not to exceed ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be and are hereby appropriated and shall be used for construction of highways, bridges, and tunnels, wherein there is to be federal participation (all of said bonds, for convenience, being sometimes hereinafter referred to as the “1960 bonds”). As provided in Section 50 of the Constitution of the Commonwealth, no part of said indebtedness shall be incurred unless authorized and approved by a majority vote upon submission to the voters at an election as hereinafter provided. Such submission shall be at the regular elections which are to be held on November 8, 1960.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 3, effective June 16, 1960.

177.720.
Bonds for park purposes and bonds for highways, bridges and tunnels to be designated distinguishably — Separation of proceeds.

Bonds of the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) authorized for state park purposes, and bonds of the ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) authorized for highways, bridges and tunnels shall be given separate and distinguishable designations by resolution of the commission prior to the issuance of any of the 1960 bonds; and in all proceedings relating to authorization, sale and delivery the identity of the bonds shall be manifest; provided, however, the commission may in its discretion, at one (1) time or from time to time, offer for sale, upon the same occasion, all or any part of both of the separately designated blocks of bonds.

The proceeds of bonds issued for park purposes shall be segregated by the commission from all other moneys and funds and shall constitute the “State Park Acquisition and Improvement Fund,” hereby created; and expenditures therefrom shall be made upon order of the commissioner of parks subject to financial and budgetary procedures as may be provided by law only for costs of establishing, developing and improving state parks, and developing and improving existing state parks, and upon order of the commission for defraying expenses incident to the issuance of bonds. Pending expenditure, such proceeds shall be deposited in one or more financial institutions, and each institution shall give security by making a valid pledge to the Commonwealth of United States government securities approved by the commission and having an aggregate market value at all times at least equal to the current balance of the deposit; provided, however, the commission may, in its discretion, cause all or any part of the moneys in the said “state park acquisition and improvement fund” to be invested and from time to time reinvested in United States government securities, and income received from such investments shall be retained in said fund and may be invested and reinvested in like manner. Securities held for the account of said fund shall be converted into cash, upon order of the commission, and disbursed and expended whenever required for the designated purposes of the fund.

The proceeds of bonds issued for highways, bridges and tunnels shall be segregated by the commission from all other moneys and funds and shall constitute the “State Highway Construction Fund of 1960,” hereby created; and expenditures therefrom shall be made upon order of the commissioner of highways of the Commonwealth for construction of highways, bridges and tunnels wherein there is to be federal cost participation; and by the commission for defraying expenses incident to the issuance of bonds. Pending expenditure, such proceeds may be deposited, secured, invested, reinvested and converted into cash in the same manner as is provided in subsection (2) with reference to the proceeds of the bonds issued for park purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 4, effective June 16, 1960.

177.730.
Bonds for park purposes and bonds for highways, bridges and tunnels to have separate sources of payment of principal and interest — Provisions for levying taxes as required by the Constitution.

All of said 1960 bonds shall, as aforesaid, be direct general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth and shall be issued with an irrevocable pledge of the full faith, credit, resources and unlimited taxing power of the Commonwealth, but in accordance with the mandatory requirement of Section 50 of the Constitution of the Commonwealth there shall be levied and collected, annually, taxes sufficient to pay the interest stipulated, and to discharge the debt within thirty (30) years, as follows:

In order to provide for the payment of the stipulated interest, and to discharge within thirty (30) years, the indebtedness to be evidenced by the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of 1960 bonds to be issued for acquisition, development and improvement of state parks and for development and improvement of existing state parks, there shall be levied and collected annually so long as any of such bonds are outstanding and unpaid, taxes of the Commonwealth upon all real property, tangible personal property, and intangible personal property from time to time subject to taxation by the Commonwealth, at rates not less than the rates now imposed by law or rates so adjusted as not in any event to jeopardize the prompt payment of principal of and interest on said bonds when due and payable. All proceeds of such taxes, to the extent necessary for payment of the principal of and interest on the ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of 1960 bonds designated for state park purposes, as and when such principal and interest, respectively, shall become due and payable, are hereby appropriated for that purpose; and such amount thereof shall in each year be set aside in the State Treasury in the “Park Bond Sinking Fund,” hereby created, and shall be held therein and disbursed and used upon order of the State Treasurer solely for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on said bonds when and where due and payable, until all of said bonds, or such lesser amount thereof as may have been issued within thirty (30) years from date of first issue shall have been paid in full. In each year, after setting aside such prescribed amount into the park bond sinking fund, the remainder of the proceeds of said identified taxes shall be available for any proper general fund purposes of the Commonwealth without restriction. Moneys from time to time set aside and deposited in said park bond sinking fund, as hereinabove provided, may be invested by the State Investment Commission from time to time in United States government securities which mature, or are subject to redemption at the option of the holder, at or before the various times when cash funds will be required for payment of the maturing principal of and interest on said identified bonds; and income received from such securities shall be retained in the said park bond sinking fund and may be taken into consideration in the next ensuing annual determination of the amount of such tax proceeds required to be set aside into the said fund as hereinabove provided.

In order to provide for the payment of the stipulated interest, and to discharge within thirty (30) years the indebtedness to be evidenced by the ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) of 1960 bonds to be issued for the construction of highways, bridges and tunnels there shall be levied and collected, annually, taxes of the Commonwealth for the benefit of the state road fund in the form of license, excise taxes and fees relating to registration, operation and use of vehicles on public highways and excise taxes, use and license fees and taxes relating to gasoline and other motor fuels consumed upon the public highways in the Commonwealth, at rates not less than the rates now imposed by law or at rates so adjusted as to produce for the road fund not less than the amount now derived from all such sources. Subject to certain prior vested rights hereinafter enumerated, all proceeds of such taxes, to the extent necessary for payment of the principal of and interest on the ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) of 1960 bonds designated for the highways, bridges and tunnels, as and when such principal and interest, respectively, become due and payable, are hereby appropriated for that purpose; and such amount thereof shall in each year be set aside in the State Treasury into the “Highway Bond Sinking Fund of 1960,” hereby created within the state road fund, and shall be held therein and disbursed and used upon order of the State Treasurer solely for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on said identified bonds when and where due, until all of said bonds, or such lesser amount thereof as may have been issued within such period of thirty (30) years, shall have been paid in full; provided, however, moneys in said fund may be invested pending disbursement as in the case of moneys in the park bond sinking fund as herein above provided. In setting aside moneys from the proceeds of such taxes and fees into the highway bond sinking fund of 1960, due regard shall be had for any and all vested rights in and to such proceeds existing in favor of (a) the holders of general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth heretofore or hereafter issued and outstanding pursuant to KRS

177.580

to

177.630

, as authorized and approved by the voters at the general election on November 6, 1956, (b) the holders of revenue bonds issued for constructing the turnpike between Louisville and Elizabethtown, Kentucky, as provided in this chapter and in a certain trust agreement made in connection with the issuance of said bonds, including recognition of the commitment of the Commonwealth to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating said turnpike, (c) the holders of revenue bonds issued for the construction of certain bridges as set forth in KRS Chapter 180 and in certain trust indentures securing such bridge revenue bonds, including the commitment of the Commonwealth to pay the cost of operating and maintaining such bridges, (d) the holders of valid contracts of the Department of Highways which are in existence on the respective dates any bonds are issued pursuant to KRS

177.700

to

177.820

, and (e) the right of the several counties of the Commonwealth to receive distribution of certain revenues for the respective county road funds as provided in KRS

47.020

. The right is reserved to the Commonwealth to provide in the future for the construction of additional turnpikes and bridges and financing the same by issuing revenue bonds; and in all such instances the Commonwealth shall have the right to create for the security and source of payment of such revenue bonds a first and prior pledge of and lien upon any and all revenues identified as being generated by such respective projects. In each year, after setting aside into the 1960 highway bond sinking fund the amount herein prescribed, and after due recognition of the rights enumerated above, the remainder of the proceeds derived from such taxes and fees may be expended and used for any lawful and proper purposes of the state road fund as otherwise permitted by the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 5, effective June 16, 1960.

177.740.
Form of question for ballots if bonds not sold prior to August 31, 1960.

In the event the unissued 1956 bonds are not sold by the commission on or prior to August 31, 1960, as provided in subsection (2) of KRS

177.700

, the form of the question which shall be caused to appear upon the ballots at the occasion of the general election to be held on November 8, 1960, shall be as follows:

GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR HIGHWAYS AND PARKS

“Are you in favor of the Act of the General Assembly known as Senate Bill No. 251, enacted at the Regular Session of 1960, wherein it is proposed to remove the three percent interest rate limitation presently applicable and permit the otherwise lawful rate to apply to unissued bonds of the Commonwealth’s issue of general obligation bonds for highways, bridges and tunnels, authorized by the voters at an election held on November 6, 1956, and that the Commonwealth issue and sell additional general obligation bonds in the principal sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) from the proceeds of which ten million dollars ($10,000,000) will be set aside for establishing, developing, and improving state parks and developing and improving existing state parks, and ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) will be set aside for constructing and improving highways, bridges and tunnels in the Commonwealth wherein there is to be federal cost participation?”

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 6.

177.750.
Form of question for ballots if bonds are sold prior to August 31, 1960.

In the event the said unissued 1956 bonds are sold by the commission on or prior to August 31, 1960, the form of the question which shall be caused to appear on the ballots at the occasion of said general election to be held November 8, 1960, shall be as follows:

GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR HIGHWAYS AND PARKS

“Are you in favor of the Act of the General Assembly known as Senate Bill No. 251, enacted at the regular session of 1960, wherein it is proposed that the Commonwealth issue and sell its general obligation bonds, in addition to all bonds heretofore authorized by the voters, in the principal sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) from the proceeds of which ten million dollars ($10,000,000) will be set aside for establishing, developing, and improving state parks and developing and improving existing state parks, and ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) will be set aside for constructing and improving highways, bridges and tunnels in the Commonwealth wherein there is to be federal cost participation?”

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 7.

177.760.
Submission of question to the people — Duties of Secretary of State.

KRS

177.700

to

177.820

shall be submitted to the people of the Commonwealth at the general election to be held on November 8, 1960. The fact of such submission shall be publicly advertised in the following ways:

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State, immediately after September 1, 1960, to determine whether the ballot question shall be the one set forth in KRS

177.740

, or the one set forth in KRS

177.750

, and to inform the Attorney General of the Commonwealth of such determination. It shall then be the duty of the Attorney General to prepare and furnish to the Secretary of State, not later than September 15, 1960, a form of “Notice of Election,” which shall be so designated, shall conform to any requirements otherwise provided by law for notices of elections, and further shall set forth the proper ballot question in full, and KRS

177.700

to

177.820

in full, with provisions for the signature of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall transmit a copy of such form of “Notice of Election” to each of five (5) daily newspapers of bona fide general circulation, published in different areas of the Commonwealth and selected in the discretion of the Secretary of State, with directions that the same be published in each of such newspapers in the form of a legal notice, in one (1) issue published in each of the calendar weeks commencing on Mondays, October 10, 17, 24, and 31, 1960, but not in any Sunday issue. Each such newspaper shall publish the same as directed, in the size type customarily used by it in publishing legal notices, and shall be entitled to payment according to its standard prevailing rate for publication of legal notices. After the last publication, each such newspaper shall provide to the Secretary of State, with or before its bill for publication, at least three (3) copies of an affidavit sufficient to constitute proper proof of publication, and if the Secretary of State finds the same to be in order he shall be authorized to draw a warrant upon the State Treasurer for payment from uncommitted moneys in the general fund of the Commonwealth.

The Secretary of State shall deliver a copy of said form of “Notice of Election” to the state printer, and thereupon the state printer shall promptly prepare and furnish to the Secretary of State at least one hundred twenty-five (125) copies of such notice in the form of handbills of sufficient size and type composition as to be ordinarily legible. The Secretary of State shall furnish a copy of the notice in such handbill form to the county clerk of each county of the Commonwealth, and it shall be the duty of each county clerk, upon receiving the same, to post the same at or near the county courthouse door, or otherwise as notices of judicial sales and other court proceedings are customarily posted.

Each county clerk shall cause a facsimile of the ballot question to be published as may be required by law.

If the Secretary of State shall perform in proper and timely fashion each of the duties provided in this section to be performed by him, any failure of others to perform duties and functions as herein provided shall not invalidate the election as to approval or disapproval of KRS

177.700

to

177.820

, if upon consideration of the Commonwealth as a whole, it shall appear that the qualified voters were fairly apprised of the election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 8, effective June 16, 1960; 1978, ch. 384, § 302, effective June 17, 1978.

177.770.
Election held in conjunction with general election.

Said election shall be conducted in conjunction with the regular elections otherwise provided by law to be held on the same day, by the same election officers and at the same polling places. The votes cast in favor of and against KRS

177.700

to

177.820

shall be canvassed and certified to the State Board of Elections as in the case of votes cast in the election of officers of the state at large. If it be found that a majority of the votes cast on the question were in favor of KRS

177.700

to

177.820

, the State Board of Elections shall so certify to the Governor and the Governor shall proclaim that KRS 177.700 to 177.820 has been approved and is in effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 9, effective June 16, 1960.

177.780.
Sale of bonds — Conditions.

If the question submitting KRS

177.700

to

177.820

to the people at said election on November 8, 1960, shall have been in the form set forth in KRS

177.740

, then from and after the proclaiming by the Governor that KRS

177.700

to

177.820

has been approved and is in effect, any unissued bonds of the issue for highways, bridges and tunnels, as proposed by KRS

177.580

to

177.630

, approved and authorized by the voters at the election held on November 6, 1956, as aforesaid, may be sold and issued by the commission, at one (1) time or from time to time, in strict conformity with all provisions of said KRS

177.580

to

177.630

, with the sole exception that pursuant to the voters’ authorization and approval of KRS 177.700 to 177.820, the heretofore prevailing interest rate limitation of three percent (3%) per annum may be disregarded and any or all of said bonds may be sold and issued to bear any interest rate or not exceeding the then prevailing maximum rate as prescribed by statute in and for the Commonwealth generally.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 10, effective June 16, 1960.

177.790.
Bonds to mature in thirty years — Other details to be established by the State Property and Buildings Commission.

If KRS

177.700

to

177.820

be approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon at said election, the initial date of issue of the 1960 bonds shall be established by resolution of the State Property and Buildings Commission prior to the first issuance and sale of any of said bonds; and thereafter all of the 1960 bonds, whenever issued, shall be dated as of said date, and shall mature as to principal on or prior to the thirtieth (30th) anniversary thereof. The bonds shall be sold for not less than par or face amount and shall bear interest at such rate or rates, but not to exceed the rate referred to in KRS

177.780

, as said commission may determine, and interest may be made payable semiannually. The bonds may be issued at one time or from time to time as the State Property and Buildings Commission may determine by its resolution or resolutions; and said commission shall in its discretion determine all details thereof, including but not by way of limitation, their denominations, whether the bonds shall be of term or serial maturities, and the amount which shall mature on any serial maturity date; whether the bonds, or any of them, shall be subject to redemption prior to stated maturities and upon what terms; place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be within the Commonwealth or outside thereof; whether interest shall be evidenced by annexed coupons; whether the bonds shall be registered or registrable as to principal or interest, or both, and any other details not contrary to law or inconsistent with KRS

177.700

to

177.820

which in the discretion of said commission may appear wise and expedient.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 11, effective June 16, 1960.

177.800.
Bonds to be sold at public sale or sales — Manner of advertising — Interest rates to be established by the commission and may be determined on basis of competition.

The bonds shall be sold by the commission, in its discretion, at one (1) sale or from time to time as funds are required for the identified purposes. Each sale shall be upon sealed purchase bids which shall be publicly opened and considered after solicitation at least ten (10) days in advance by publication of a notice at least one (1) time in a financial newspaper or journal published in the City and State of New York, and by advertisement by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. The commission may fix one (1) or more interest rates by resolutions adopted prior to publication of the advertisement, or may notify bidders to stipulate in their bids one (1) or more interest rates of their own choosing and fix the rate or rates by resolution when action is taken upon the bids. The commission shall reserve the right to reject bids.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 106, § 12; 1966, ch. 239, § 152.